District of Columbia statutes.
3-1301

Created; appointment; composition; qualifications; vacancies; term of office; compensation.

(a)

There is hereby created by the District of Columbia the District of Columbia Lottery and Charitable Games Control Board, hereinafter referred to as the Board. The 1st Board shall be appointed as hereinafter specified within 60 days of March 10, 1981. The Board shall consist of 5 members who shall be appointed by the Mayor of the District of Columbia with the consent of the Council of the District of Columbia. Of the members appointed, one shall be designated as Chairperson of the Board by the Mayor of the District of Columbia.

(b)

Each member of the Board, at the time of appointment and qualification, shall be a registered voter in the District for at least 5 years preceding appointment and qualification and shall be not less than 21 years of age. In the event of a vacancy on the Board as a consequence of resignation, disability, death, or for other reasons, the Mayor of the District of Columbia shall appoint, with the consent of the Council of the District of Columbia, another person to fill the vacancy.

(c)

Of the members of the Board first appointed, 2 shall hold office for 2 years, from 1981 to 1983; 2 for 3 years from that date; and the Chairperson, 4 years from that date. Thereafter, members shall be appointed for terms of 4 years from the 1st day of July in the year of their appointment and until their successors are appointed and have qualified.

(d)

Each member of the Board shall receive a stipend of $15,000 annually, except the Chairperson of the Board, who shall receive an additional stipend of $3,000 annually for a total of $18,000.

History

Mar. 10, 1981, D.C. Law 3-172, § 4, 27 DCR 4736

Cross References

Nomination and approval of agency heads, see § 1-523.01.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-523.01.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-2501.

Editor's Notes

Restriction on advertising, sale, operation, or playing of lotteries, raffles, bingos, etc., on Federal enclave: See Pub. L. 97-91, 103 Stat. 1174, December 4, 1981, as amended by Pub. L. 101-168, 103 Stat. 1282, November 21, 1989.

Sources of funding appropriation: Public Law 103-127, 107 Stat. 1343, the District of Columbia Appropriations Act, 1994, provided that the District of Columbia shall identify the sources of funding for this appropriation title from the District’s own locally-generated revenues, and provided further, that no revenues from Federal sources shall be used to support the operations or activities of the Lottery and Charitable Games Control Board.

Restrictions on use of Federal payment: Section 134 of Pub. L. 101-168, the District of Columbia Appropriations Act, 1990, provided that the paragraph under the heading “Lottery and Charitable Games Enterprise Fund” in the District of Columbia Appropriation Act, 1982, approved December 4, 1981 (95 Stat. 1174; Public Law 97-91), is amended by striking the 10th proviso; and in the 11th proviso, by striking “1144, as well as in the Old Georgetown Historic District:” and inserting “1144:”; and the 11th proviso referred to in subsection (a)(2), as amended by such subsection, shall not apply with respect to any activity relating to a lottery, raffle, bingo, or other game of chance sponsored by, and conducted solely for the benefit of, an organization which is described in section 501(c)(3), and exempt from tax under section 501(a), of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.

Appropriations authorized: Public Law 103-334, 108 Stat. 2582, the District of Columbia Appropriations Act, 1995, provided for the Lottery and Charitable Games Enterprise Fund, established by the District of Columbia Appropriations Act for the fiscal year ending September 30, 1982, approved December 4, 1981 (95 Stat. 1174; Public Law 97-91), as amended, for the purpose of implementing § 2-2501 et seq. and 22-1516 et seq., $8,318,000, to be derived from non-Federal District of Columbia revenues. Provided, That the District of Columbia shall identify the source of funding for this appropriation title from the District’s own locally-generated revenues: Provided further, That no revenues from Federal sources shall be used to support the operations or activities of the Lottery and Charitable Games Control Board.